Utah statutes.
63G-6a-504.   Contents of request for information.

A request for information may seek a wide range of information, including:

(1)  availability of a procurement item;

(2)  delivery schedules;

(3)  industry standards and practices;

(4)  product specifications;

(5)  training;

(6)  new technologies;

(7)  capabilities of potential providers of a procurement item; and

(8)  alternate solutions.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

